New Jersey, session 221, S3188.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. In addition to the amounts appropriated under 1[P.L.2022, c.49] P.L.2023, c.741, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending 1[June 30, 2023] June 30, 20241, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 67 DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS 80 Special Government Services 83 Services to Veterans 3610 Veterans Program Support GRANTS-IN-AID 50-3610  Veterans Outreach and Assistance ....................... $500,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation,.................................... Veterans Program Support ................................................... $500,000 Grants-in-Aid: 50   [Catholic Charities, Diocese of Paterson-SOS Veterans Unmet Needs Fund] New Jersey SOS Veterans Stakeholders Group ................................................................ ($500,000) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.